Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-780
Administrator; period of authority; termination.

The administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the Auditor of Public Accounts or until the district court shall terminate the authority of the auditor and the administrator. A petition for review by the court of the original order may be filed by any person with an interest in the district. The court shall have the power to terminate the authority of the Auditor of Public Accounts and the administrator upon its determination that none of the conditions set forth in section 31-773 exist or it is in the best interest of the district that the authority of the administrator be terminated. A termination of the authority of the Auditor of Public Accounts and the administrator shall reinstate the authority of the board of trustees pursuant to sections 31-727 to 31-770.

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 42.